Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.25
State Emergency Capital Construction Contingency Fund; purpose.

The proceeds of the State Emergency Capital Construction Contingency Fund created by section 81-1108.24 shall be expended by the Department of Administrative Services as and when approved by the Governor. Such proceeds shall be expended to supplement available funds for construction projects when needed for emergency construction, repair, or remodeling. For the purposes of this section emergency shall mean that a clear and foreseeable danger is created and that without institution of appropriate measures to reduce or alleviate such danger the health, safety, or welfare of the citizens of this state or the purposes of the facility will be or will continue to be threatened.

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 16.